Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3804
State and federal grants; expend.

Any county providing, or city or village receiving, police services pursuant to sections 19-3801 to 19-3804 may receive and expend for the purposes of sections 19-3801 to 19-3804 any available state or federal grants.

Laws 1971, LB 594, § 4.